src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн. ! This also includes ж_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Fem: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_anim_gPrb ;

LEXICON жо_b- ! This also includes ж_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Fem: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_anim_Prb ;

LEXICON жо_8b ! This also includes ж_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Fem: FьSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON жо_d
+N+Fem: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON жо_d2
+N+Fem: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_anim_ей ;

LEXICON жо_8e
+N+Fem: FьSgStem_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom_anim ;

LEXICON жо_8e_дочь
+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:до́чь # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Acc:до́чь # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Gen:до́чери # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Loc:до́чери # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Dat:до́чери # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins:до́черью # ;
+N+Fem:до́черь ыPlAnom_anim ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Ins:дочерьми́ # ;

LEXICON жо_8e_лошадь
жо_8e ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Ins:ми́ # ;

LEXICON жо_8e_мать
+N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:ма́ть # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Acc:ма́ть # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Gen:ма́тери # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Loc:ма́тери # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Dat:ма́тери # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins:ма́терью # ;
+N+Fem:ма́терь ыPlAnom_anim ;

LEXICON жо_f
+N+Fem: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlAnom_anim ;

LEXICON жо_f_ова
+N+Fem:ова́ FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem:ова́ ыPlNomStem_anim ;
+N+Fem:ова́ PlAccStem_anim ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Gen:о́в # ;
+N+Fem:ова́ PlPeriphEnd_anim ;

LEXICON ж_[п_a]
+N+Fem: FSg_SubstAdj_Stem ;
+N+Fem: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem ;

LEXICON соб-ж_[п_a]
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: FSg_SubstAdj_Stem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem ;

LEXICON ж_[п_b]
+N+Fem: FSg_SubstAdj_End ;
+N+Fem: Pl_SubstAdj_End ;

LEXICON соб-ж_[п_b]
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: FSg_SubstAdj_End ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: Pl_SubstAdj_End ;

LEXICON ж_[мс_a]
+N+Fem: Noun_мс-п_a_Fem_inan ;
+N+Fem: Noun_мс-п_a_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON ж_[мс_b]
+N+Fem: Noun_мс-п_b_Fem_inan ;
+N+Fem: Noun_мс-п_b_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON жо_[мо_b]
+N+Fem: MSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Fem: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON жо_[п_a]
+N+Fem: FSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;
+N+Fem: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;

LEXICON жо_[п_a_R]
+N+Fem: FSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R ;
+N+Fem: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R ;

LEXICON жо_[п_b]
+N+Fem: FSg_SubstAdj_End_anim ;
+N+Fem: Pl_SubstAdj_End_anim ;

LEXICON ф._a_?_0
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Fem: Indecl_Sg_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+MFN: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON ф._b_?_0
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Msc: MSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Fem: Indecl_Sg_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+MFN: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON ф._[мс_a]
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Surname_stem ;

LEXICON ф._[мс_b]
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Surname_end ;

LEXICON ф._[п_a]
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Msc: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Fem: FSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+MFN: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;

LEXICON ф._[п_b]
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Msc: MSg_SubstAdj_End_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Fem: FSg_SubstAdj_End_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+MFN: Pl_SubstAdj_End_anim ;

LEXICON ф._0
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Surname_0 ;

LEXICON ф._0_22
! Ukrainian/Polish/Belorusian -ко
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:о Surname_0 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:а Surname_0 ; !TODO add XIX-century жо 3*a readings


LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Msc_inan
+Inan: Noun_мс-п_a_Msc ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Msc_anim
+Anim: Noun_мс-п_a_Msc ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Msc
+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Neu_inan
+Inan: Noun_мс-п_a_Neu ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Neu_anim
+Anim: Noun_мс-п_a_Neu ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Neu
+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Fem_inan
+Inan: Noun_мс-п_a_Fem ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Fem_anim
+Anim: Noun_мс-п_a_Fem ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Fem
+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
! +Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
! +Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ою # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Pl_inan
+Inan: Noun_мс-п_a_Pl ;
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Pl_anim
+Anim: Noun_мс-п_a_Pl ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;

! LEXICON Noun_мс-п_a_Pl
! +Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Msc_inan
+Inan: Noun_мс-п_b_Msc ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Msc_anim
+Anim: Noun_мс-п_b_Msc ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́ # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Msc
+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
! +Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Neu_inan
+Inan: Noun_мс-п_b_Neu ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Neu_anim
+Anim: Noun_мс-п_b_Neu ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Neu
+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
! +Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Fem_inan
+Inan: Noun_мс-п_b_Fem ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Fem_anim
+Anim: Noun_мс-п_b_Fem ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Fem
+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>о́й # ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>о́й # ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>о́й # ;
! +Sg+Ins:%>о́й # ;
! +Sg+Ins+Fac:%>о́ю # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Pl_inan
+Inan: Noun_мс-п_b_Pl ;
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;

LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Pl_anim
+Anim: Noun_мс-п_b_Pl ;
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;

! LEXICON Noun_мс-п_b_Pl
! +Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;
! +Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;
! +Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;

LEXICON Surname_stem
Surname_stem_Msc ;
Surname_stem_Fem ;
Surname_stem_Pl ;

LEXICON Surname_stem_Msc
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:%>е # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON Surname_stem_Fem
+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:%>ою # ;

! LEXICON Surname_stem_Pl
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON Surname_end
Surname_end_Msc ;
Surname_end_Fem ;
Surname_end_Pl ;

LEXICON Surname_end_Msc
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а́ # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:%>е́ # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON Surname_end_Fem
+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Gen:%>о́й # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Loc:%>о́й # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Dat:%>о́й # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins:%>о́й # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:%>о́ю # ;

! LEXICON Surname_end_Pl
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;

LEXICON Surname_0
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins: # ;
+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Gen: # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Loc: # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Dat: # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins: # ;
! +Fem+Anim+Sg+Ins+Fac: # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom: # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc: # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Gen: # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Loc: # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Dat: # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Ins: # ;

LEXICON Patronymic_stem
вич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:вич MSgStem_anim ;
вич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:вич ыPlStem_anim ;
вна+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Fem:вна FSgStem_anim ;
вна+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Fem:вна ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON Patronymic_stem_Fac
вич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:вич MSgStem_anim_Fac ;
вич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:вич ыPlStem_anim_Fac ;
вна+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Fem:вна FSgStem_anim_Fac ;
вна+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Fem:вна ыPlStem_anim_Fac ;

LEXICON Patronymic_ыч
вич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:ыч MSgStem_anim_Elid ;
вич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:ыч ыPlStem_anim_Elid ;

LEXICON Patronymic_ич
вич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:ич MSgStem_anim_Elid ;
вич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:ич ыPlStem_anim_Elid ;

LEXICON Patronymic_вна
вна+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Fem:вна FSgStem_anim_Elid ;
вна+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Fem:вна ыPlStem_anim_Elid ;

LEXICON FSg_SubstAdj_Stem
+Inan: FSg_SubstAdj_Stem_All ;

LEXICON FSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim
+Anim: FSg_SubstAdj_Stem_All ;
