src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
третья:тре́т%^Fий ж_[мс_a] ;
девичья:де́вич%^Fий ж_[мс_a] ;
ничья:нич%^Fе́й ж_[мс_b] "weight: 3.7403808162466183" ;
съезжая:съе́зж ж_[п_a] ;
кухмистерская:кухми́стерск ж_[п_a] ;
русская:ру́сск ж_[п_a] ;
маленькая:ма́леньк ж_[п_a] ;
парадная:пара́дн ж_[п_a] ;
подорожная:подоро́жн ж_[п_a] ;
приёмная:приёмн ж_[п_a] ; 
переменная:переме́нн ж_[п_a] ;
подлунная:подлу́нн ж_[п_a] ;
наборная:набо́рн ж_[п_a] ;
околёсная:околёсн ж_[п_a] ; 
подсолнечная:подсо́лнечн ж_[п_a] ;
сосисочная:соси́сочн ж_[п_a] ;
вольная:во́льн ж_[п_a] ;
несущая:несу́щ ж_[п_a] ;
бельевая:бельев ж_[п_b] ;
кубовая:кубов ж_[п_b] ;
передовая:передов ж_[п_b] ;
буровая:буров ж_[п_b] ;
мостовая:мостов ж_[п_b] ;
людская:людск ж_[п_b] ;
телемастерская:тѐлемастерск ж_[п_b] ;
автомастерская:а̀втомастерск ж_[п_b] ;
кучерская:кучерск ж_[п_b] ;
восьмая:восьм ж_[п_b] ;
отбивная:отбивн ж_[п_b] ;
докладная:докладн ж_[п_b] ;
парная:парн ж_[п_b] ;
водяная:водян ж_[п_b] ;
сухая:сух ж_[п_b] ;
вошь:в%^Fо́шь жо_8b "weight: 3.5098410737385297" ;
лебедь:ле́бедь жо_8e "weight: 4.225249149885733" ;
сельдь:се́льдь жо_8e "weight: 3.329793225321471" ;
сельдь:се́льдь жо_8e "weight: 3.329793225321471" ;
стерлядь:сте́рлядь жо_8e "weight: 3.184168788029196" ;
матерь:ма́терь жо_8e "weight: 3.1668087093714035" ;
сволочь:сво́лочь жо_8e "weight: 4.6304883650163635" ;
мышь:мы́шь жо_8e "weight: 4.411278553687814" ;
тень:те́нь жо_8e "weight: 5.109828562017976" ; ! [поэтич._также_8a]
мать: жо_8e_мать "weight: 5.664997224470847" ;
дочь: жо_8e_дочь "weight: 5.133282870360592" ;
лошадь:ло́шадь жо_8e_лошадь "weight: 5.109626566476915" ;
бабец:баб%^Fе́ц жо_[мо_b] ;
новоприезжая:новоприе́зж жо_[п_a] ;
новенькая:но́веньк жо_[п_a] ;
обвиняемая:обвиня́ем жо_[п_a] ;
знакомая:знако́м жо_[п_a] ;
подконвойная:подконво́йн жо_[п_a] ;
сосланная:со́сланн жо_[п_a] ;
расслабленная:рассла́бленн жо_[п_a] ;
умалишённая:умалишённ жо_[п_a] ; 
дежурная:дежу́рн жо_[п_a] ;
сердечная:серде́чн жо_[п_a] ;
чахоточная:чахо́точн жо_[п_a] ;
гончая:го́нч жо_[п_a] ;
служащая:слу́жащ жо_[п_a] ;
верующая:ве́рующ жо_[п_a] ;
совершеннолетняя:совершенноле́тнь жо_[п_a] ;
учащаяся:уча́щ жо_[п_a_R] ;
кривая:крив жо_[п_b] ;
чумовая:чумов жо_[п_b] ;
молодая:молод жо_[п_b] "weight: 5.179893749834602" ;
чужая:чуж жо_[п_b] ;
борзая:борз жо_[п_b] ;
немая:нем жо_[п_b] ;
глухонемая:глухонем жо_[п_b] ;
хромая:хром жо_[п_b] ;
связная:связн жо_[п_b] ;
коренная:коренн жо_[п_b] ;
крепостная:крепостн жо_[п_b] ;
душевнобольная:душѐвнобольн жо_[п_b] ;
слепая:слеп жо_[п_b] ;
святая:свят жо_[п_b] ;
глиста:гли́ста́ жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 3.041004272364715" ; ! Р. мн. обычно берется от варианта глист
сайга:са́йга́ жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн. ;
кабарга:кабар%^Fо́га́ жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн. ;
карга:ка́рга́ жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 3.041004272364715" ;
яга:я́га́ жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 4.062512596703943" ;
юла:ю́ла́ жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 3.7634004228541937" ;
кума:ку́ма́ жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 3.5779117282185293" ;
раба:ра́ба́ жо_b- "weight: 3.781693181453538" ; ! мн. избегается из-за совпадений с раб
плотва:пло́тва́ жо_b- ;
кострома:костро́ма́ жо_b- ;
желна:жёлна́ жо_b- ;
густера:густе́ра́ жо_b- ;
камса:ка́мса́ жо_b- ;
моща:мо́ща́ жо_b- "weight: 3.922440555945201" ;
сопля:соп%^Fёля́ жо_b- "weight: 3.9737012437036596" ;
треска:трес%^Fо́ка́ жо_b- "weight: 3.3417954347442382" ;
сова:со́ва́ жо_d "weight: 3.8725247825221016" ;
звезда:звёзда́ жо_d "weight: 5.147863539394985" ;
рок-звезда:ро̀к-звёзда́ жо_d ;
поп-звезда:по̀п-звёзда́ жо_d ;
телезвезда:тѐлезвёзда́ жо_d ;
кинозвезда:кѝнозвёзда́ жо_d "weight: 3.52691970568769" ;
суперзвезда:суперзвёзда́ жо_d "weight: 3.0640448756318226" ;
стрекоза:стреко́за́ жо_d "weight: 3.6367446693473346" ;
жена:жёна́ жо_d "weight: 5.67408784880447" ;
лиса:ли́са́ жо_d "weight: 3.8074265378068834" ;
дрофа:дро́фа́ жо_d ;
сноха:сно́ха́ жо_d "weight: 3.0859244446606486" ;
рыбозмея:рыбозме́я́ жо_d ;
свинья:сви́н%^Fе́йя́ жо_d "weight: 4.620426534132333" ;
блоха:бло́ха́ жо_f "weight: 3.8154553668328735" ;
медсестра:мѐдсёст%^Fёра́ жо_d "weight: 4.36576610723831" ;
